Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB339.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 8 TLSB 1005YC (9) 91 as/ns H.F. _____ DIVISION I 1 FY 2025-2026 APPROPRIATIONS 2 Section 1. DEPARTMENT OF JUSTICE. 3 1. There is appropriated from the general fund of the state 4 to the department of justice for the fiscal year beginning July 5 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following amounts, or 6 so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes 7 designated: 8 a. For the general office of attorney general for 9 salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes, 10 including the prosecuting attorneys training program, matching 11 funds for federal violence against women grant programs, 12 victim assistance grants, the office of drug control policy 13 prosecuting attorney program, and odometer fraud enforcement, 14 and for not more than the following full-time equivalent 15 positions: 16 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 10,693,063 17 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 237.00 18 As a condition of receiving the appropriation provided 19 in this lettered paragraph, the department of justice shall 20 maintain a record of the estimated time incurred representing 21 each agency or department. 22 The general office of attorney general may temporarily 23 exceed and draw more than the amount appropriated in this 24 lettered paragraph and incur a negative cash balance as long 25 as there are receivables equal to or greater than the negative 26 balances and the amount appropriated in this lettered paragraph 27 is not exceeded at the close of the fiscal year. 28 b. For victim assistance grants: 29 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 5,766,708 30 Of the moneys appropriated in this lettered paragraph, 31 $500,000 is allocated to provide grants to care providers 32 providing services to victims of human trafficking. The 33 remaining moneys appropriated in this lettered paragraph 34 are allocated to provide grants to care providers providing 35 -1- LSB 1005YC (9) 91 as/ns 1/ 27 H.F. _____ services to all other victims of violent crime. 1 The balance of the victim compensation fund established 2 in section 915.94 may be used to provide salary and support 3 of not more than 24.00 full-time equivalent positions and to 4 provide maintenance for the victim compensation functions 5 of the department of justice. In addition to the full-time 6 equivalent positions authorized pursuant to this paragraph, 7 7.00 full-time equivalent positions are authorized and shall 8 be used by the department of justice to employ one accountant 9 and four program planners. The department of justice may 10 employ the additional 7.00 full-time equivalent positions 11 authorized pursuant to this paragraph that are in excess of the 12 number of full-time equivalent positions authorized only if 13 the department of justice receives sufficient federal moneys 14 to maintain employment for the additional full-time equivalent 15 positions during the current fiscal year. The department 16 of justice shall only employ the additional 7.00 full-time 17 equivalent positions in succeeding fiscal years if sufficient 18 federal moneys are received during each of those succeeding 19 fiscal years. 20 The department of justice shall transfer at least $150,000 21 from the victim compensation fund established in section 915.94 22 to the victim assistance grant program established in section 23 13.31. 24 Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys appropriated in this 25 lettered paragraph that remain unencumbered or unobligated at 26 the close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain 27 available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the 28 close of the succeeding fiscal year. 29 c. For legal services for persons in poverty grants as 30 provided in section 13.34: 31 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,634,601 32 d. To improve the department of justiceâs cybersecurity and 33 technology infrastructure: 34 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 202,060 35 -2- LSB 1005YC (9) 91 as/ns 2/ 27 H.F. _____ 2. a. The department of justice, in submitting budget 1 estimates for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, pursuant 2 to section 8.23, shall include a report of funding from sources 3 other than amounts appropriated directly from the general fund 4 of the state to the department of justice or to the office of 5 consumer advocate. These funding sources shall include but 6 are not limited to reimbursements from other state agencies, 7 commissions, boards, or similar entities, and reimbursements 8 from special funds or internal accounts within the department 9 of justice. The department of justice shall also report actual 10 reimbursements for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2024, 11 and actual and expected reimbursements for the fiscal year 12 beginning July 1, 2025. 13 b. The department of justice shall include the report 14 required under paragraph âaâ, as well as information regarding 15 any revisions occurring as a result of reimbursements actually 16 received or expected at a later date, in a report to the 17 general assembly. The department of justice shall submit the 18 report on or before January 15, 2026. 19 3. a. The department of justice shall fully reimburse 20 the costs and necessary related expenses incurred by the Iowa 21 law enforcement academy to continue to employ one additional 22 instructor position who shall provide training for human 23 trafficking-related issues throughout the state. 24 b. The department of justice shall obtain the moneys 25 necessary to reimburse the Iowa law enforcement academy to 26 employ such an instructor from unrestricted moneys from either 27 the victim compensation fund established in section 915.94 or 28 the human trafficking victim fund established in section 915.95 29 or the human trafficking enforcement fund established in 2015 30 Iowa Acts, chapter 138, section 141. 31 4. Notwithstanding sections 553.19 and 714.16C, for the 32 fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, 33 any moneys not otherwise appropriated from the antitrust fund 34 created in section 553.19 and the consumer education and 35 -3- LSB 1005YC (9) 91 as/ns 3/ 27 H.F. _____ litigation fund created in section 714.16C are appropriated to 1 the department of justice for salaries, support, maintenance, 2 and miscellaneous purposes necessary to perform the duties 3 described in section 13.2. 4 Sec. 2. OFFICE OF CONSUMER ADVOCATE. There is appropriated 5 from the commerce revolving fund created in section 546.12 to 6 the office of consumer advocate of the department of justice 7 for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 8 2026, the following amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, 9 to be used for the purposes designated: 10 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 11 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 12 equivalent positions: 13 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,763,937 14 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 14.75 15 The office of consumer advocate shall include in its charges 16 assessed or revenues generated an amount sufficient to cover 17 the amount stated in its appropriation and any state-assessed 18 indirect costs determined by the department of administrative 19 services. 20 Sec. 3. DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS ââ FACILITIES. 21 1. There is appropriated from the general fund of the state 22 to the department of corrections for the fiscal year beginning 23 July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following amounts, 24 or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes 25 designated: 26 a. For the operation of the Fort Madison correctional 27 facility, including salaries, support, maintenance, and 28 miscellaneous purposes: 29 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 46,577,646 30 b. For the operation of the Anamosa correctional facility, 31 including salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 32 purposes: 33 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 39,401,446 34 c. For the operation of the Oakdale correctional facility, 35 -4- LSB 1005YC (9) 91 as/ns 4/ 27 H.F. _____ including salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 1 purposes: 2 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 59,081,235 3 d. For the Oakdale correctional facility for 4 department-wide institutional pharmaceuticals and miscellaneous 5 purposes: 6 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 10,425,417 7 e. For the operation of the Newton correctional facility, 8 including salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 9 purposes: 10 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 32,349,915 11 f. For the operation of the Mount Pleasant correctional 12 facility, including salaries, support, maintenance, and 13 miscellaneous purposes: 14 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 30,357,365 15 g. For the operation of the Rockwell City correctional 16 facility, including salaries, support, maintenance, and 17 miscellaneous purposes: 18 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 11,726,196 19 h. For the operation of the Clarinda correctional facility, 20 including salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 21 purposes: 22 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 29,268,191 23 Moneys received by the department of corrections as 24 reimbursement for services provided to the Clarinda youth 25 corporation are appropriated to the department and shall be 26 used for the purpose of operating the Clarinda correctional 27 facility. 28 i. For the operation of the Mitchellville correctional 29 facility, including salaries, support, maintenance, and 30 miscellaneous purposes: 31 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 26,097,515 32 j. For the operation of the Fort Dodge correctional 33 facility, including salaries, support, maintenance, and 34 miscellaneous purposes: 35 -5- LSB 1005YC (9) 91 as/ns 5/ 27 H.F. _____ . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 34,147,756 1 k. For reimbursement of counties for temporary confinement 2 of prisoners, as provided in sections 901.7, 904.908, and 3 906.17, and for offenders confined pursuant to section 904.513: 4 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,345,319 5 l. For federal prison reimbursement, reimbursements for 6 out-of-state placements, and miscellaneous contracts: 7 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 234,411 8 2. The department of corrections shall use moneys 9 appropriated in subsection 1 to continue to contract for the 10 services of a Muslim imam and a Native American spiritual 11 leader. 12 Sec. 4. DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS ââ ADMINISTRATION. 13 There is appropriated from the general fund of the state to the 14 department of corrections for the fiscal year beginning July 15 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following amounts, or 16 so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes 17 designated: 18 1. For general administration, including salaries and the 19 adjustment of salaries throughout the department, support, 20 maintenance, employment of an education director to administer 21 a centralized education program for the correctional system, 22 and miscellaneous purposes: 23 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 8,165,695 24 a. It is the intent of the general assembly that each 25 lease negotiated by the department of corrections with a 26 private corporation for the purpose of providing private 27 industry employment of inmates in a correctional institution 28 shall prohibit the private corporation from utilizing inmate 29 labor for partisan political purposes for any person seeking 30 election to public office in this state and that a violation 31 of this requirement shall result in a termination of the lease 32 agreement. 33 b. It is the intent of the general assembly that as a 34 condition of receiving the appropriation provided in this 35 -6- LSB 1005YC (9) 91 as/ns 6/ 27 H.F. _____ subsection the department of corrections shall not enter into 1 a lease or contractual agreement pursuant to section 904.809 2 with a private corporation for the use of building space for 3 the purpose of providing inmate employment without providing 4 that the terms of the lease or contract establish safeguards to 5 restrict, to the greatest extent feasible, access by inmates 6 working for the private corporation to personal identifying 7 information of citizens. 8 2. For educational programs for inmates at state penal 9 institutions: 10 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,108,109 11 a. To maximize the funding for educational programs, 12 the department shall establish guidelines and procedures to 13 prioritize the availability of educational and vocational 14 training for inmates based upon the goal of facilitating an 15 inmateâs successful release from the correctional institution. 16 b. The director of the department of corrections may 17 transfer moneys from Iowa prison industries and the canteen 18 operating funds established pursuant to section 904.310, for 19 use in educational programs for inmates. 20 c. Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys appropriated in 21 this subsection that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the 22 close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain 23 available for expenditure for the purposes designated in this 24 subsection until the close of the succeeding fiscal year. 25 3. For the development and operation of the Iowa corrections 26 offender network (ICON) data system: 27 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,000,000 28 4. For offender mental health and substance abuse 29 treatment: 30 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 28,065 31 5. For department-wide duties, including operations, costs, 32 and miscellaneous purposes: 33 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 5,905,778 34 Sec. 5. JUDICIAL DISTRICT DEPARTMENTS OF CORRECTIONAL 35 -7- LSB 1005YC (9) 91 as/ns 7/ 27 H.F. _____ SERVICES. 1 1. There is appropriated from the general fund of the state 2 to the department of corrections for the fiscal year beginning 3 July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, for salaries, support, 4 maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes, the following amounts, 5 or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes 6 designated: 7 a. For the first judicial district department of 8 correctional services: 9 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 17,301,981 10 It is the intent of the general assembly that the first 11 judicial district department of correctional services maintains 12 the drug courts operated by the district department. 13 b. For the second judicial district department of 14 correctional services: 15 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 14,230,459 16 It is the intent of the general assembly that the second 17 judicial district department of correctional services maintains 18 two drug courts to be operated by the district department. 19 c. For the third judicial district department of 20 correctional services: 21 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 8,915,522 22 d. For the fourth judicial district department of 23 correctional services: 24 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 6,465,898 25 e. For the fifth judicial district department of 26 correctional services, including funding for electronic 27 monitoring devices for use on a statewide basis: 28 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 25,026,927 29 It is the intent of the general assembly that the fifth 30 judicial district department of correctional services maintains 31 the drug court operated by the district department. 32 f. For the sixth judicial district department of 33 correctional services: 34 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 17,690,992 35 -8- LSB 1005YC (9) 91 as/ns 8/ 27 H.F. _____ It is the intent of the general assembly that the sixth 1 judicial district department of correctional services maintains 2 the drug court operated by the district department. 3 g. For the seventh judicial district department of 4 correctional services: 5 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 11,013,381 6 It is the intent of the general assembly that the seventh 7 judicial district department of correctional services maintains 8 the drug court operated by the district department. 9 h. For the eighth judicial district department of 10 correctional services: 11 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 10,241,148 12 2. Each judicial district department of correctional 13 services, within the moneys available, shall continue programs 14 and plans established within that district to provide for 15 intensive supervision, sex offender treatment, diversion of 16 low-risk offenders to the least restrictive sanction available, 17 job development, and expanded use of intermediate criminal 18 sanctions. 19 3. Each judicial district department of correctional 20 services shall provide alternatives to prison consistent with 21 chapter 901B. The alternatives to prison shall ensure public 22 safety while providing maximum rehabilitation to the offender. 23 A judicial district department of correctional services may 24 also establish a day program. 25 4. The office of drug control policy of the department 26 of public safety shall consider federal grants made to the 27 department of corrections for the benefit of each of the eight 28 judicial district departments of correctional services as local 29 government grants, as defined pursuant to federal regulations. 30 5. The department of corrections shall continue to contract 31 with a judicial district department of correctional services to 32 provide for the rental of electronic monitoring equipment which 33 shall be available statewide. 34 6. The public safety assessment shall not be utilized in 35 -9- LSB 1005YC (9) 91 as/ns 9/ 27 H.F. _____ pretrial hearings when determining whether to detain or release 1 a defendant before trial until such time the use of the public 2 safety assessment has been specifically authorized by the 3 general assembly. 4 Sec. 6. DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS ââ REALLOCATION OF 5 APPROPRIATIONS. Notwithstanding section 8.39, within 6 the moneys appropriated in this Act to the department of 7 corrections, the department may reallocate the moneys 8 appropriated and allocated as necessary to best fulfill the 9 needs of the correctional institutions, administration of 10 the department, and the judicial district departments of 11 correctional services. However, in addition to complying with 12 the requirements of section 904.116 and providing notice to 13 the legislative services agency, the department of corrections 14 shall also provide notice to the department of management, 15 prior to the effective date of the revision or reallocation of 16 an appropriation made pursuant to this section. The department 17 of corrections shall not reallocate an appropriation or 18 allocation for the purpose of eliminating any program. 19 Sec. 7. INTENT ââ REPORTS. 20 1. The department of corrections, in cooperation with 21 townships, the Iowa cemetery associations, and other nonprofit 22 or governmental entities, may use inmate labor during the 23 fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, to restore or preserve 24 rural cemeteries and historical landmarks. The department, in 25 cooperation with the counties, may also use inmate labor to 26 clean up roads, major water sources, and other water sources 27 around the state. 28 2. By January 15, 2026, the department shall provide an 29 annual status report regarding private-sector employment to 30 the general assembly. The report shall include the number 31 of offenders employed in the private sector, the combined 32 number of hours worked by the offenders, the total amount of 33 allowances, and the distribution of allowances pursuant to 34 section 904.702, including any moneys deposited in the general 35 -10- LSB 1005YC (9) 91 as/ns 10/ 27 H.F. _____ fund of the state. 1 Sec. 8. ELECTRONIC MONITORING REPORT. The department of 2 corrections shall submit a report on electronic monitoring 3 to the general assembly by January 15, 2026. The report 4 shall specifically address the number of persons being 5 electronically monitored and break down the number of persons 6 being electronically monitored by offense committed. The 7 report shall also include a comparison of any data from the 8 prior fiscal year with the current fiscal year. 9 Sec. 9. STATE AGENCY PURCHASES FROM PRISON INDUSTRIES. 10 1. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise 11 requires, âstate agencyâ means the government of the state 12 of Iowa, including but not limited to all executive branch 13 departments, agencies, boards, bureaus, and commissions, the 14 judicial branch, the general assembly and all legislative 15 agencies, institutions within the purview of the state board of 16 regents, and any corporation whose primary function is to act 17 as an instrumentality of the state. 18 2. State agencies are encouraged to purchase products from 19 Iowa state industries, as defined in section 904.802, when 20 purchases are required and the products are available from 21 Iowa state industries. State agencies shall obtain bids from 22 Iowa state industries for purchases of office furniture during 23 the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, exceeding $5,000 or 24 in accordance with applicable administrative rules related to 25 purchases for the agency. 26 Sec. 10. IOWA LAW ENFORCEMENT ACADEMY. 27 1. There is appropriated from the general fund of the 28 state to the Iowa law enforcement academy for the fiscal year 29 beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following 30 amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the 31 purposes designated: 32 a. For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 33 purposes, including jailer training and technical assistance, 34 and for not more than the following full-time equivalent 35 -11- LSB 1005YC (9) 91 as/ns 11/ 27 H.F. _____ positions: 1 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,908,138 2 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 30.25 3 b. The Iowa law enforcement academy may temporarily exceed 4 and draw more than the amount appropriated in this subsection 5 and incur a negative cash balance as long as there are 6 receivables equal to or greater than the negative balance and 7 the amount appropriated in this subsection is not exceeded at 8 the close of the fiscal year. 9 2. The Iowa law enforcement academy may select at least 10 five automobiles of the department of public safety, division 11 of state patrol, prior to turning over the automobiles to 12 the department of administrative services to be disposed 13 of by public auction, and the Iowa law enforcement academy 14 may exchange any automobile owned by the academy for each 15 automobile selected if the selected automobile is used in 16 training law enforcement officers at the academy. However, any 17 automobile exchanged by the academy shall be substituted for 18 the selected vehicle of the department of public safety and 19 sold by public auction with the receipts being deposited in the 20 depreciation fund maintained pursuant to section 8A.365 to the 21 credit of the department of public safety, division of state 22 patrol. 23 3. The Iowa law enforcement academy shall provide training 24 for domestic abuse and human trafficking-related issues 25 throughout the state. The training shall be offered at no 26 cost to the attendees and the training shall not replace any 27 existing domestic abuse or human trafficking training offered 28 by the academy. 29 Sec. 11. STATE PUBLIC DEFENDER. 30 1. There is appropriated from the general fund of the state 31 to the office of the state public defender of the department 32 of inspections, appeals, and licensing for the fiscal year 33 beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following 34 amounts, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the 35 -12- LSB 1005YC (9) 91 as/ns 12/ 27 H.F. _____ purposes designated: 1 a. For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 2 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 3 equivalent positions: 4 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 36,065,363 5 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 265.90 6 Of the moneys appropriated in this lettered paragraph, 7 $100,000 is allocated to the college student aid commission 8 within the department of education for the administration of 9 the rural attorney recruitment assistance program established 10 in section 256.231, if enacted by 2025 Iowa Acts, House File 11 1001 or Senate File 250, or successor legislation. 12 b. For payments on behalf of eligible adults and juveniles 13 from the indigent defense fund, in accordance with section 14 815.11: 15 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 42,726,374 16 2. Moneys received by the office of the state public 17 defender pursuant to Tit. IV-E of the federal Social Security 18 Act remaining unencumbered and unobligated at the end of the 19 fiscal year shall not revert but shall be transferred to the 20 Tit. IV-E juvenile justice improvement fund created in 2022 21 Iowa Acts, chapter 1146, section 11, subsection 3, to remain 22 available for expenditure by the office of the state public 23 defender in succeeding fiscal years for the purposes allowed by 24 Tit. IV-E of the federal Social Security Act. 25 Sec. 12. BOARD OF PAROLE. There is appropriated from the 26 general fund of the state to the board of parole for the fiscal 27 year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the 28 following amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be 29 used for the purposes designated: 30 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 31 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 32 equivalent positions: 33 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,565,782 34 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 10.80 35 -13- LSB 1005YC (9) 91 as/ns 13/ 27 H.F. _____ Sec. 13. DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC DEFENSE. 1 1. There is appropriated from the general fund of the 2 state to the department of public defense, for the fiscal year 3 beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following 4 amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the 5 purposes designated: 6 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 7 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 8 equivalent positions: 9 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 7,398,691 10 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 248.00 11 2. The department of public defense may temporarily exceed 12 and draw more than the amount appropriated in this section and 13 incur a negative cash balance as long as there are receivables 14 of federal funds equal to or greater than the negative balance 15 and the amount appropriated in this section is not exceeded at 16 the close of the fiscal year. 17 Sec. 14. DEPARTMENT OF HOMELAND SECURITY AND EMERGENCY 18 MANAGEMENT. 19 1. There is appropriated from the general fund of the state 20 to the department of homeland security and emergency management 21 for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 22 2026, the following amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, 23 to be used for the purposes designated: 24 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 25 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 26 equivalent positions: 27 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,446,138 28 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 25.44 29 2. The department of homeland security and emergency 30 management may temporarily exceed and draw more than the amount 31 appropriated in this section and incur a negative cash balance 32 as long as there are receivables of federal funds equal to or 33 greater than the negative balance and the amount appropriated 34 in this section is not exceeded at the close of the fiscal 35 -14- LSB 1005YC (9) 91 as/ns 14/ 27 H.F. _____ year. 1 Sec. 15. DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY. There is appropriated 2 from the general fund of the state to the department of public 3 safety for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending 4 June 30, 2026, the following amounts, or so much thereof as is 5 necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 6 1. For administrative functions, including salaries and the 7 adjustment of salaries throughout the department, the criminal 8 justice information system, and for not more than the following 9 full-time equivalent positions: 10 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 7,092,910 11 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 48.00 12 2. For the division of criminal investigation, including 13 the stateâs contribution to the peace officersâ retirement, 14 accident, and disability system provided in chapter 97A in the 15 amount of the stateâs normal contribution rate, as defined in 16 section 97A.8, multiplied by the salaries for which the moneys 17 are appropriated, to meet federal fund matching requirements, 18 and for not more than the following full-time equivalent 19 positions: 20 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 21,189,769 21 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 180.00 22 3. For the criminalistics laboratory fund created in 23 section 691.9: 24 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 650,000 25 Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys appropriated in this 26 subsection that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the close 27 of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain available 28 for expenditure for the purposes designated until the close of 29 the succeeding fiscal year. 30 4. a. For the division of narcotics enforcement, including 31 the stateâs contribution to the peace officersâ retirement, 32 accident, and disability system provided in chapter 97A in the 33 amount of the stateâs normal contribution rate, as defined in 34 section 97A.8, multiplied by the salaries for which the moneys 35 -15- LSB 1005YC (9) 91 as/ns 15/ 27 H.F. _____ are appropriated, to meet federal fund matching requirements, 1 and for not more than the following full-time equivalent 2 positions: 3 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 10,265,032 4 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 71.00 5 The division of narcotics enforcement is authorized an 6 additional 1.00 full-time equivalent position pursuant to 7 this lettered paragraph that is in excess of the number of 8 full-time equivalent positions authorized for the previous 9 fiscal year only if the division of narcotics enforcement 10 receives sufficient federal moneys to maintain employment 11 for the additional full-time equivalent position during the 12 current fiscal year. The division of narcotics enforcement 13 shall only employ the additional full-time equivalent position 14 in succeeding fiscal years if sufficient federal moneys are 15 received during each of those succeeding fiscal years. 16 b. For the division of narcotics enforcement for undercover 17 purchases: 18 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 209,042 19 5. For the division of state fire marshal, for fire 20 protection services as provided through the state fire service 21 and emergency response council as created in the department, 22 and for the stateâs contribution to the peace officersâ 23 retirement, accident, and disability system provided in chapter 24 97A in the amount of the stateâs normal contribution rate, 25 as defined in section 97A.8, multiplied by the salaries for 26 which the moneys are appropriated, and for not more than the 27 following full-time equivalent positions: 28 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,554,935 29 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 21.00 30 6. For the division of state patrol, for salaries, support, 31 maintenance, workersâ compensation costs, and miscellaneous 32 purposes, including the stateâs contribution to the peace 33 officersâ retirement, accident, and disability system provided 34 in chapter 97A in the amount of the stateâs normal contribution 35 -16- LSB 1005YC (9) 91 as/ns 16/ 27 H.F. _____ rate, as defined in section 97A.8, multiplied by the salaries 1 for which the moneys are appropriated, and for not more than 2 the following full-time equivalent positions: 3 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 92,232,969 4 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 613.00 5 It is the intent of the general assembly that members of the 6 state patrol be assigned to patrol the highways and roads in 7 lieu of assignments for inspecting school buses for the school 8 districts. 9 7. For deposit in the sick leave benefits fund established 10 in section 80.42 for all departmental employees eligible to 11 receive benefits for accrued sick leave under the collective 12 bargaining agreement: 13 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 279,517 14 8. For costs associated with the training and equipment 15 needs of volunteer fire fighters: 16 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,075,520 17 Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys appropriated in this 18 subsection that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the close 19 of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain available 20 for expenditure for the purposes designated in this subsection 21 until the close of the succeeding fiscal year. 22 9. For the public safety interoperable and broadband 23 communications fund established in section 80.44: 24 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 115,661 25 10. For the office to combat human trafficking established 26 pursuant to section 80.45, including salaries, support, 27 maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes, and for not more than 28 the following full-time equivalent positions: 29 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 200,742 30 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 2.00 31 11. For department-wide duties, including operations, 32 costs, and miscellaneous purposes: 33 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,944,668 34 12. For deposit in the public safety equipment fund 35 -17- LSB 1005YC (9) 91 as/ns 17/ 27 H.F. _____ established in section 80.48 for the purchase, maintenance, and 1 replacement of equipment used by the department: 2 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,500,000 3 13. For the office of drug control policy, for salaries, 4 support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes, including 5 statewide coordination of the drug abuse resistance education 6 (D.A.R.E) programs or other similar programs, and for not more 7 than the following full-time equivalent positions: 8 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 249,219 9 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 4.00 10 Notwithstanding section 8.39, the department of public 11 safety may reallocate moneys appropriated in this section 12 as necessary to best fulfill the needs provided for in the 13 appropriation. However, the department shall not reallocate 14 moneys appropriated to the department in this section unless 15 notice of the reallocation is given to the legislative services 16 agency and the department of management prior to the effective 17 date of the reallocation. The notice shall include information 18 regarding the rationale for reallocating the moneys. The 19 department shall not reallocate moneys appropriated in this 20 section for the purpose of eliminating any program. 21 Sec. 16. GAMING ENFORCEMENT. 22 1. There is appropriated from the gaming enforcement 23 revolving fund created in section 80.43 to the department of 24 public safety for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and 25 ending June 30, 2026, the following amount, or so much thereof 26 as is necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 27 For any direct support costs for agents and officers of 28 the division of criminal investigationâs excursion gambling 29 boat, gambling structure, and racetrack enclosure enforcement 30 activities, including salaries, support, maintenance, and 31 miscellaneous purposes, and for not more than the following 32 full-time equivalent positions: 33 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 12,227,940 34 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 65.00 35 -18- LSB 1005YC (9) 91 as/ns 18/ 27 H.F. _____ 2. For each additional license to conduct gambling games on 1 an excursion gambling boat, gambling structure, or racetrack 2 enclosure issued during the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, 3 there is appropriated from the gaming enforcement revolving 4 fund to the department of public safety for the fiscal year 5 beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, an additional 6 amount of not more than $300,000 to be used for full-time 7 equivalent positions. 8 3. The department of public safety, with the approval of the 9 department of management, may employ no more than three special 10 agents for each additional riverboat or gambling structure 11 regulated after July 1, 2026, and three special agents for 12 each racing facility which becomes operational during the 13 fiscal year which begins July 1, 2026. Positions authorized 14 in this subsection are in addition to the full-time equivalent 15 positions otherwise authorized in this section. 16 Sec. 17. DEPARTMENT OF HOMELAND SECURITY AND EMERGENCY 17 MANAGEMENT. There is appropriated from the 911 emergency 18 communications fund created in section 34A.7A to the department 19 of homeland security and emergency management for the fiscal 20 year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the 21 following amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be 22 used for the purposes designated: 23 For implementation, support, and maintenance of the 24 functions of the administrator and program manager under 25 chapter 34A and to employ the auditor of the state to perform 26 an annual audit of the 911 emergency communications fund: 27 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 300,000 28 Sec. 18. CONSUMER EDUCATION AND LITIGATION ââ FARM 29 MEDIATION AND PROSECUTIONS, APPEALS, AND CLAIMS. 30 Notwithstanding section 714.16C , there is appropriated from the 31 consumer education and litigation fund to the department of 32 justice for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending 33 June 30, 2026, the following amounts, or so much thereof as is 34 necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 35 -19- LSB 1005YC (9) 91 as/ns 19/ 27 H.F. _____ 1. For farm mediation services as specified in section 1 13.13, subsection 2 : 2 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 300,000 3 2. For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 4 purposes for criminal prosecutions, criminal appeals, and 5 performing duties pursuant to chapter 669 : 6 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,000,000 7 DIVISION II 8 INDIGENT DEFENSE AND REPRESENTATION 9 Sec. 19. Section 815.7, subsection 9, Code 2025, is amended 10 to read as follows: 11 9. For appointments made on or after July 1, 2024, through 12 June 30, 2025, the reasonable compensation shall be calculated 13 on the basis of eighty-six dollars per hour for class âAâ 14 felonies, eighty-one dollars per hour for class âBâ felonies, 15 and seventy-six dollars per hour for all other cases. 16 Sec. 20. Section 815.7, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 17 following new subsection: 18 NEW SUBSECTION . 9A. For appointments made on or after July 19 1, 2025, the reasonable compensation shall be calculated on the 20 basis of eighty-eight dollars per hour for class âAâ felonies, 21 eighty-three dollars per hour for class âBâ felonies, and 22 seventy-eight dollars per hour for all other cases. 23 DIVISION III 24 ATTORNEY GENERAL ââ CONSUMER EDUCATION AND LITIGATION FUND 25 Sec. 21. Section 714.16C, subsection 2, Code 2025, is 26 amended to read as follows: 27 2. For each fiscal year, not more than one million one 28 hundred twenty-five eight hundred seventy-five thousand dollars 29 is appropriated from the fund to the department of justice to 30 be used for public education relating to consumer fraud and for 31 enforcement of section 714.16 and federal consumer laws, and 32 not more than seventy-five one hundred twenty-five thousand 33 dollars is appropriated from the fund to the department of 34 justice to be used for investigation, prosecution, and consumer 35 -20- LSB 1005YC (9) 91 as/ns 20/ 27 H.F. _____ education relating to consumer and criminal fraud committed 1 against older Iowans. 2 DIVISION IV 3 LAW ENFORCEMENT ââ ADMINISTRATIVE PROCEDURES 4 Sec. 22. Section 80B.11, subsection 1, paragraph h, Code 5 2025, is amended by striking the paragraph. 6 Sec. 23. Section 80B.13A, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code 7 2025, is amended to read as follows: 8 a. âFinalâ means that all appeals through a grievance 9 procedure , civil service action, or other cause of action or 10 procedure available to the officer or civil service have been 11 exhausted. 12 Sec. 24. Section 80B.13A, subsection 2, paragraph c, Code 13 2025, is amended by striking the paragraph. 14 Sec. 25. Section 80B.13A, subsection 3, paragraphs a and b, 15 Code 2025, are amended to read as follows: 16 a. For any other grounds authorized by rules adopted 17 pursuant to section 80B.11, subsection 1 , paragraph âhâ , or 18 section 80D.4A The law enforcement officer or reserve peace 19 officer has been discharged for just cause from employment as a 20 law enforcement officer or reserve peace officer and the action 21 is final . 22 b. When an employing agency recommends to the council that 23 revocation or suspension would be appropriate with regard to a 24 current or former employee. A recommendation by an employing 25 agency must be in writing and set forth the reasons why the 26 action is being recommended, the findings of the employing 27 agency concerning the matter, the action taken by the employing 28 agency, and that the action by the agency is final The law 29 enforcement officer or reserve peace officer voluntarily quits 30 when disciplinary action was pending, under circumstances 31 warranting discharge or removal for just cause . 32 Sec. 26. Section 80B.13A, Code 2025, is amended by adding 33 the following new subsections: 34 NEW SUBSECTION . 7. Revocation actions shall not be 35 -21- LSB 1005YC (9) 91 as/ns 21/ 27 H.F. _____ maintained on grounds other than as expressly provided in this 1 section. Any actions pending before the council on grounds 2 other than expressly provided for in this section shall be 3 immediately dismissed. The rules of evidence shall apply to a 4 contested case involving the revocation or suspension of a law 5 enforcement officerâs or reserve peace officerâs certification. 6 NEW SUBSECTION . 8. If the law enforcement officerâs or 7 reserve peace officerâs certification was suspended pursuant 8 to an order of the council or settlement agreement, the 9 officer shall not be required to apply for reinstatement of the 10 officerâs certification upon completion of the suspension. 11 NEW SUBSECTION . 9. The academy shall promptly provide 12 copies of the complete investigative report and records 13 concerning the law enforcement officer or reserve peace officer 14 to the officer or the officerâs legal counsel upon written 15 request. 16 Sec. 27. Section 622.10, subsection 9, Code 2025, is amended 17 to read as follows: 18 9. a. A peer support group counselor or individual 19 present for a individual or group crisis intervention who 20 obtains information from an officer or a civilian employee 21 of a law enforcement agency , emergency management agency, 22 emergency medical services agency, or fire department by 23 reason of the counselorâs capacity as a peer support group 24 counselor or an individualâs presence for a individual or 25 group crisis intervention shall not be allowed , in giving 26 testimony, to disclose any confidential communication properly 27 entrusted to the counselor or individual present for a group 28 crisis intervention by the officer or civilian employee while 29 receiving counseling or group crisis intervention including in 30 giving testimony . 31 b. The prohibition in this subsection does not apply 32 where the officer or civilian employee has consented to the 33 disclosure of the information specified in paragraph âaâ or 34 where the peer support group counselor or individual present 35 -22- LSB 1005YC (9) 91 as/ns 22/ 27 H.F. _____ for a individual or group crisis intervention was an initial 1 responding officer, a witness, or a party to the incident which 2 prompted the delivery of peer support group counseling services 3 or the individual or group crisis intervention to the officer 4 or civilian employee. 5 c. For purposes of this subsection : 6 (1) âOfficerâ means a certified law enforcement officer, 7 fire fighter, emergency medical technician or medical provider , 8 paramedic, corrections officer, detention officer, jailer, 9 probation or parole officer, public safety telecommunicator, 10 dispatcher, emergency management coordinator under chapter 29C , 11 or any other law enforcement officer certified by the Iowa law 12 enforcement academy and employed by a city, county, or state 13 agency. 14 (2) âPeer support group counselorâ means a law enforcement 15 officer, fire fighter, civilian employee of a law enforcement 16 agency or fire department, or a nonemployee counselor who 17 has been designated as a peer support group counselor by a 18 sheriff, police chief, fire chief, or department head of a 19 law enforcement agency, fire department, or emergency medical 20 services agency and who has received training to provide 21 emotional and moral support and counseling to an officer or 22 group who needs those services as a result of an incident in 23 which the officer or group was involved while acting in the 24 officerâs or groupâs official capacity. 25 Sec. 28. EFFECTIVE DATE. This division of this Act, being 26 deemed of immediate importance, takes effect upon enactment. 27 DIVISION V 28 DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS ââ CAPITAL REINVESTMENT FUND 29 Sec. 29. Section 904.317, subsection 1, Code 2025, is 30 amended to read as follows: 31 1. The director, subject to the approval of the board, may 32 secure options to purchase real estate and acquire and sell 33 real estate for the proper uses of the institutions. Real 34 estate shall be acquired and sold upon terms and conditions the 35 -23- LSB 1005YC (9) 91 as/ns 23/ 27 H.F. _____ director recommends subject to the approval of the board. Upon 1 sale of the real estate, the proceeds shall be deposited in a 2 corrections capital reinvestment fund, which is established in 3 the state treasury under the purview of the department. There 4 is appropriated from the fund to the department the proceeds, 5 which may be used to purchase other real estate , or for capital 6 improvements upon property under the directorâs supervision , or 7 for upgrades to the Iowa corrections offender network system . 8 Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys in the fund that remain 9 unencumbered or unobligated at the close of a fiscal year shall 10 not revert but shall remain available for expenditure for the 11 purposes designated. Notwithstanding section 12C.7, subsection 12 2 , interest or earnings on moneys in the fund shall be credited 13 to the fund. 14 DIVISION VI 15 DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS ââ FEDERAL RECEIPTS FUND 16 Sec. 30. NEW SECTION . 904.118 Federal receipts fund. 17 1. A federal receipts fund is established in the state 18 treasury under the control of the department. The fund shall 19 consist of all of the following: 20 a. All federal moneys received by the department, including 21 but not limited to moneys received for federally contracted 22 services, but excluding moneys required to be deposited in the 23 special fund pursuant to section 8.41. 24 b. Any other moneys appropriated to or deposited in the 25 fund. 26 2. Moneys in the fund are appropriated to the department 27 for purposes of the operations of the department and any other 28 use authorized or required under the federal law or contract 29 pursuant to which the moneys were paid. This subsection 30 does not apply to federal moneys the expenditure of which is 31 otherwise provided for by law, including but not limited to 32 federal moneys described in section 904.301B, subsection 14. 33 3. Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys in the fund 34 that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the close of a 35 -24- LSB 1005YC (9) 91 as/ns 24/ 27 H.F. _____ fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain available for 1 expenditure for the purposes designated. Notwithstanding 2 section 12C.7, subsection 2, interest or earnings on moneys in 3 the fund shall be credited to the fund. 4 Sec. 31. EFFECTIVE DATE. This division of this Act, being 5 deemed of immediate importance, takes effect upon enactment. 6 Sec. 32. RETROACTIVE APPLICABILITY. This division of this 7 Act applies retroactively to the fiscal year beginning July 1, 8 2023. 9